California statutes. Vehicle Code
(d) A charge under this section shall be dismissed if the person charged alleges in court, under oath, that the charge against the person is the first charge against that person under this section, unless it is otherwise established in court that the charge is not the first
 charge against the person.

(e) (1) Except as provided in subdivision (d), a violation of this section is an infraction punishable by a fine of not more than twenty-five dollars ($25).

(2) The parent or legal guardian having control or custody of an unemancipated minor whose conduct violates this section shall be jointly and severally liable with the minor for the amount of the fine imposed pursuant to this subdivision.

(f) A record of the action shall not be transmitted to the court and a fee shall not be imposed pursuant to Section 40611 for a citation for not wearing a properly fitted and fastened bicycle helmet pursuant to subdivision (a) if the parent or legal guardian of the person described in subdivision (a) delivers proof to the issuing agency within 120 days after the citation was
 issued that the person has a helmet meeting the requirements specified in subdivision (a) and the person has completed a local bicycle safety course or, if the violation involved an electric bicycle, a specialized electric bicycle safety course, which may include, but is not limited to, the electric bicycle safety and training program developed by the Department of the California Highway Patrol pursuant to Section 894 of the Streets and Highways Code, or a related safety course, if one is available, as prescribed by authorities in the local jurisdiction.

(g) Notwithstanding Section 1463 of the Penal Code or any other law, the fines collected for a violation of this section shall be allocated as follows:

(1) Seventy-two and one-half percent of the amount collected shall be deposited in a special account of the county health department, to be used for bicycle, nonmotorized scooter,
 skateboard, and in-line and roller skate safety education and for assisting low-income families in obtaining approved bicycle helmets for persons under 18 years of age, either on a loan or purchase basis. The county may contract for the implementation of this program, which, to the extent practicable, shall be operated in conjunction with the child passenger restraint program pursuant to Section 27360.

(2) Two and one-half percent of the amount collected shall be deposited in the county treasury to be used by the county to administer the program described in paragraph (1).

(3) If the violation occurred within a city, 25 percent of the amount collected shall be transferred to, and deposited in, the treasury of that city. If the violation occurred in an unincorporated area, this 25 percent shall be deposited and used pursuant to paragraph (1).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 36, Sec. 2.   (AB 544)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

21212.5.

(a) A person shall not sell a class 3 electric bicycle to a person under 16 years of age.

(b) A violation of this section is an infraction and shall be punishable by a fine not to exceed two hundred and fifty dollars ($250).

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 65, Sec. 1.   (AB 965)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

21213.

(a) A person under 16 years of age shall not operate a class 3 electric bicycle.

(b) A person shall not operate a class 3 electric bicycle, or ride upon a class 3 electric bicycle as a passenger, upon a street, bikeway, as defined in Section 890.4 of the Streets and Highways Code, or any other public bicycle path or trail, unless that person is wearing a properly fitted and fastened bicycle helmet that meets the standards of either the American Society for Testing and Materials (ASTM) or the United States Consumer Product Safety Commission (CPSC), or standards subsequently established by those entities. This helmet requirement also applies to a person who rides upon a class 3 electric bicycle while in a
 restraining seat that is attached to the bicycle or in a trailer towed by the bicycle.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 568, Sec. 6.   (AB 1096)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

21214.

(a) On or before January 1, 2026, the Mineta Transportation Institute at San Jose State University, in consultation with relevant stakeholders, shall conduct a study on electric bicycles to inform efforts to improve the safety of all users of the transportation system, and submit a report of the findings from the study to the Legislature. The study shall examine, identify, and analyze available information, including, but not be limited to, all of the following topics:

(1) Data on injuries, crashes, emergency room visits, and deaths related to bicycles and electric bicycles.

(2) Factors and
 circumstances that are correlated with the crashes of bicycles and electric bicycles.

(3) Best practices for policy to promote safe use of electric bicycles.

(4) Laws in other state vehicle codes pertaining to electric bicycles.

(5) Data on the safety impacts from electric bicycle components and accessories including, but not limited to, headlights, speedometers, brakes, tires, bells, and reflectors.

(6) Data on the safety performance of electric bicycle batteries. 

(7) Data on the manufacturing of electric bicycles, including, but not limited to, the market of electric bicycles, manufacturer information,
 sales patterns, and the number of electric bicycles on California roads, including the usage by city and the reasons behind the usage.

(8) Review of policies that other countries with high electric bicycle ridership use to promote the safe use of electric bicycles, including, but not limited to, cyclist and driver training, street infrastructure policy, and insurance or licensing requirements.

(9) Recommendations for state policy to support expanded use of electric bicycles that protects the safety of riders and other road users, including, but not limited to, recommendations on whether there are needed revisions to the Vehicle Code, and improved data collection on electric bicycles.

(b) (1) A report
 to be submitted pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(2) Pursuant to Section 10231.5 of the Government Code, this section is repealed on January 1, 2030.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 869, Sec. 2.   (SB 381)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Repealed as of January 1, 2030 by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

21214.5.

(a) This section shall be known, and may be cited, as the Marin Electric Bicycle Safety Pilot Program.

(b) A local authority within the County of Marin, or the County of Marin in unincorporated areas, may, by ordinance or resolution, prohibit a person under 16 years of age from operating a class 2 electric bicycle.

(c) A local authority within the County of Marin, or the County of Marin in unincorporated areas, may, by ordinance or resolution, require a person operating a class 2 electric bicycle to wear a bicycle helmet, as described in subdivision (b) of Section 21213.

(d) (1) An ordinance or resolution adopted pursuant to this section shall make a violation punishable by warning notices for the first 60 days after the prohibition comes into effect.

(2) An ordinance or resolution prohibiting a person under 16 years of age from operating a class 2 electric bicycle shall make, after the first 60 days the prohibition has been in effect, a violation an infraction punishable by a fine of twenty-five dollars ($25). A record of the action shall not be transmitted to the court and a fee shall not be imposed upon a citation of this infraction if the parent or legal guardian of the person who violated the prohibition delivers proof to the issuing
 agency within 120 days after the citation was issued that the person has completed an electric bicycle safety and training course pursuant to Section 894 of the Streets and Highways Code.

(3) An ordinance or resolution requiring a person operating a class 2 electric bicycle to wear a bicycle helmet shall make, after the first 60 days the prohibition has been in effect, a violation an infraction punishable by a fine of twenty-five dollars ($25). A record of the action shall not be transmitted to the court and a fee shall not be imposed upon a citation of this infraction if the person who violated the requirement, or if that person is an unemancipated minor, their parent or guardian, delivers proof to the issuing agency within 120 days after the citation was issued that the person has a helmet meeting the requirements specified in subdivision (a) of Section 21212 and the person has completed a local bicycle safety course or a related safety
 course, if one is available, as prescribed by authorities in the local jurisdiction.

(4) If the person who violates an ordinance or resolution adopted pursuant to this section is an unemancipated minor, the parent or legal guardian having control or custody of the minor shall be jointly and severally liable with the minor for the amount of any fine imposed pursuant to this subdivision.

(e) (1) If an ordinance or resolution is adopted pursuant to this section, the county shall, by January 1, 2028, submit a report to the
 Legislature that includes all of the following:

(A) The total number of traffic stops initiated for violations.

(B) The results of the traffic stops, including whether a warning or citation was issued, property was seized, or an arrest was made.

(C) The number of times a person was stopped for allegedly operating a class 2 electric bicycle while under 16 years of age but was found to be over the age limit.

(D) If a warning or citation was issued, a description of the warning or the violation cited.

(E) If an arrest or traffic stop
 was made, the offense cited by the officer for the arrest
 or traffic stop and the perceived race or ethnicity, gender, and approximate age of the person stopped, provided that the identification of these characteristics is solely based on the observation and perception of the peace officer who initiated the traffic stop.

(F) The actions taken by a peace officer during the traffic stops, including, but not limited to, all of the following:

(i) Whether the peace officer asked for consent to search the person, and, if so, whether consent was provided.

(ii) Whether the peace officer searched the person or any property, and, if so, the basis for the search and the type of contraband or evidence discovered.

(iii) Whether the peace officer seized any property and, if so, the type of property that was seized and the basis for seizing the property. 

(G) The number of times that a person under 16 years of age was operating an electric bicycle and was involved in a crash that resulted in a permanent, serious injury, as defined in Section 20001, or a fatality in the six months prior to the adoption of the ordinance or resolution, the cause of the crash, and the class of the electric bicycle that was being operated at the time of the crash.

(H) The number of times that a person under 16 years of age was operating an electric bicycle and was involved in a crash that resulted in a permanent, serious injury, as defined in Section 20001, or a fatality after the adoption of the ordinance or
 resolution, the cause of the crash, and the class of the electric bicycle that was being operated at the time of the crash.

(2) A report submitted pursuant to this section shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(f) A local authority or the County of Marin shall administer a public information campaign for at least 30 calendar days prior to the enactment of an ordinance or resolution pursuant to this section, including public announcements in major media outlets and press releases.

(g) This section shall become inoperative on January 1, 2029, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 1005, Sec. 1.   (AB 1778)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Repealed as of January 1, 2029, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

21214.7.

(a) This section shall be known, and may be cited, as the San Diego Electric Bicycle Safety Pilot Program.

(b) A local authority within the County of San Diego, or the County of San Diego in unincorporated areas, may, by ordinance or resolution, prohibit a person under 12 years of age from operating a class 1 or 2 electric bicycle.

(c) (1) A violation of an ordinance or resolution adopted pursuant to this section shall be punishable as follows:

(A) For the first 60 days after the prohibition comes into effect, a warning notice.

(B) After the first 60
 days, a violation of the ordinance or resolution shall be an infraction punishable by a fine of twenty-five dollars ($25).

(2) A record of the action shall not be transmitted to the court and a fee shall not be imposed upon a citation for this infraction if the parent or legal guardian of the person who violated the prohibition delivers proof to the issuing agency within 120 days after the citation was issued that the person has completed an electric bicycle safety and training program pursuant to Section 894 of the Streets and Highways Code.

(3) If an unemancipated minor violates an ordinance or resolution adopted pursuant to this section, a parent or legal guardian with control or custody of the minor shall be jointly and severally liable with the minor for the amount of a fine imposed pursuant to this subdivision.

(d) (1) If an ordinance or resolution is adopted pursuant to this section, the county shall, by January 1, 2028, submit a report to the Legislature that includes all of the following:

(A) The total number of traffic stops initiated for a violation of the ordinance or resolution adopted pursuant to this section.

(B) The results of those traffic stops, including whether a warning or citation was issued, property was seized, or an arrest was made.

(C) The number of times a person was stopped for allegedly operating a class 1 or class 2 electric bicycle while under 12 years of age but was found to be over the age limit.

(D) If a warning or citation was issued, a description of the warning or the violation cited.

(E) If an arrest or traffic stop was made, the offense cited by the officer for the arrest or traffic stop and the perceived race or ethnicity, gender, and approximate age of the person stopped, provided that the identification of these characteristics is solely based on the observation and perception of the peace officer who initiated the traffic stop.

(F) The actions taken by a peace officer during a traffic stop, including, but not limited to, all of the following:

(i) Whether the peace officer asked for consent to search the person and, if so, whether consent was provided.

(ii) Whether the peace officer searched the person or property and, if so, the basis for the search and the type of contraband or evidence discovered.

(iii) Whether the peace officer seized property and, if so, the type of property that was seized and the basis for seizing the property.

(G) The number of times a person opted to complete, and did complete, the training course in lieu of paying the fine.

(H) The number of times that a person under 12 years of age was operating an electric bicycle and was involved in a crash that resulted in a permanent, serious injury, as defined in Section 20001, or a fatality in the six months prior to the adoption of the ordinance or resolution, the cause of the crash, and the class of the electric bicycle that was being operated at the time of the crash.

(I) The number of times that a person under 12 years of age was operating an electric bicycle and was involved in a
 crash that resulted in a permanent, serious injury, as defined in Section 20001, or a fatality after the adoption of the ordinance or resolution, the cause of the crash, and the class of the electric bicycle that was being operated at the time of the crash.

(2) A report submitted pursuant to this section shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(e) A local authority shall administer a public information campaign for at least 30 calendar days prior to the enactment of an ordinance or resolution adopted pursuant to this section, which shall include public announcements in major media outlets and press releases.

(f) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2029, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 67, Sec. 185.   (AB 1170)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Repealed as of January 1, 2029, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4.5. Operation of Pedicabs [21215. - 21215.5.]

21215.

(a) A pedicab defined in subdivision (c) of Section 467.5 shall operate subject to all of the following requirements:

(1) The pedicab shall have a seating capacity for not more than 15 passengers.

(2) The pedicab shall be authorized by local ordinance or resolution to operate within the applicable local jurisdiction. 

(3) The operator of the pedicab shall be at least 21 years of age, with a valid California driver’s license.

(4) The pedicab shall be equipped with seatbelts for all passengers, seat backs, brakes, reflectors, headlights, and grab rails. The pedicab shall be inspected annually for compliance with the requirements of this paragraph by an entity designated by the local jurisdiction that authorized the pedicab to operate. The entity may charge a reasonable fee to cover the costs of the inspection. A pedicab that does not meet these requirements shall meet these requirements by January 1, 2017, in order to continue operation.

(5) The operator of the pedicab shall at all times be able to establish financial responsibility in a minimum amount of one million dollars ($1,000,000) general liability insurance coverage and an additional five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) general umbrella insurance that
 covers the pedicab. The local jurisdiction that authorized the pedicab to operate may require additional proof of financial responsibility.

(6) A pedicab shall not operate on any highway under the jurisdiction of the local authority unless authorized by resolution or ordinance. A pedicab shall not operate on any freeway and shall not operate on any highway with a posted speed limit in excess of 30 miles per hour, except to cross the highway at an intersection.

(7) The operator of the pedicab shall annually report to the Department of the California Highway Patrol, commencing on January 1, 2016, any accidents caused or experienced by the pedicabs.

(8) The pedicab shall not load or unload passengers on roadways or in the middle of highways.

(9) Pedicabs shall be operated as close as practicable to the right-hand curb or edge of the roadway, except when necessary to overtake another vehicle, to avoid a stationary object, or when preparing to make a left turn.

(b) This article only applies to pedicabs defined by subdivision (c) of Section 467.5, and does not apply to pedicabs defined in subdivision (a) or (b) of Section 467.5.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 496, Sec. 2.   (SB 530)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

21215.2.

(a) If alcoholic beverages are consumed on board the pedicab, a pedicab defined in subdivision (c) of Section 467.5 shall additionally operate subject to all of the following requirements:

(1) The consumption of alcoholic beverages onboard the pedicab shall be authorized by local ordinance or resolution.

(2) An onboard safety monitor who is 21 years of age or older shall be present whenever alcohol is being consumed by passengers during the operation of the pedicab. The onboard safety monitor shall not be under the influence of any alcoholic beverage and shall be considered as driving the pedicab for purposes of Article 2 (commencing with Section 23152) of Chapter 12 of Division 11 during the
 operation of the pedicab.

(3) Both the operator and safety monitor shall have completed either the Licensee Education on Alcohol and Drugs (LEAD) program implemented by the Department of Alcoholic Beverage Control or a training course utilizing the curriculum components recommended by the Responsible Beverage Service Advisory Board established by the Director of Alcoholic Beverage Control.

(4) Alcoholic beverages shall not be provided by the operator or onboard safety monitor or any employee or agent of the operator or onboard safety monitor of the pedicab. Alcoholic beverages may only be supplied by the passengers of the pedicab. All alcoholic beverages supplied by passengers of the pedicab shall be in enclosed, sealed, and unopened containers that have been labeled pursuant to Chapter 13 (commencing with Section 25170) of Division 9 of the Business and Professions Code prior to
 their consumption on board the pedicab.

(5) Alcoholic beverages may be consumed by a passenger of the pedicab only while
 the passenger is physically on board and within the pedicab.

(6) All passengers shall be 21 years of age or older if alcohol is consumed during the operation of the pedicab.

(7) For purposes of this subdivision, passengers who are pedaling the device are not operators.

(b) A license or permit from the Department of Alcoholic Beverage Control shall not be required of the operator or onboard safety monitor, so long as neither they, nor their employees or agents sell, serve, or furnish any alcoholic beverage to any passenger.

(c) For purposes of this section, “alcoholic beverage” has the same meaning as defined in Section 23004 of the Business and Professions Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 280, Sec. 1.   (SB 543)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

21215.5.

This article does not preclude a local authority from imposing more stringent operating or equipment requirements on a pedicab subject to this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 496, Sec. 2.   (SB 530)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Operation of Motorized Scooters [21220. - 21235.]

21220.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares both of the following:

(1) This state has severe traffic congestion and air pollution problems, particularly in its cities, and finding ways to reduce these problems is of paramount importance.

(2) Motorized scooters that meet the definition of Section 407.5 produce no emissions and, therefore, do not contribute to increased air pollution or increase traffic congestion.

(b) It is the intent of the Legislature in adding this article to promote the use of alternative low-emission or no-emission transportation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 722, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

21220.5.

For the purposes of this article, a motorized scooter is defined in Section 407.5.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 722, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

21221.

Every person operating a motorized scooter upon a highway has all the rights and is subject to all the provisions applicable to the driver of a vehicle by this division, including, but not limited to, provisions concerning driving under the influence of alcoholic beverages or drugs, and by Division 10 (commencing with Section 20000), Division 17 (commencing with Section 40000.1), and Division 18 (commencing with Section 42000), except those provisions which, by their very nature, can have no application.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 722, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

21221.5.

Notwithstanding Section 21221, it is unlawful for any person to operate a motorized scooter upon a highway while under the influence of an alcoholic beverage or any drug, or under the combined influence of an alcoholic beverage and any drug. Any person arrested for a violation of this section may request to have a chemical test made of the person’s blood or breath for the purpose of determining the alcoholic or drug content of that person’s blood pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 23612, and, if so requested, the arresting officer shall have the test performed. A conviction of a violation of this section shall be punished by a fine of not more than two hundred fifty dollars ($250).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 287, Sec. 25.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

21223.

(a) Every motorized scooter operated upon any highway during darkness shall be equipped with the following:

(1) Except as provided in subdivision (b), a lamp emitting a white light which, while the motorized scooter is in motion, illuminates the highway in front of the operator and is visible from a distance of 300 feet in front and from the sides of the motorized scooter.

(2) Except as provided in subdivision (c), a red reflector on the rear that is visible from a distance of 500 feet to the rear when directly in front of lawful upper beams of headlamps on a motor vehicle.

(3) A white or yellow reflector on each side visible from the front and rear of the motorized scooter from a distance of 200 feet.

(b) A lamp or lamp combination, emitting a white light, attached to the operator and visible from a distance of 300 feet in front and from the sides of the motorized scooter, may be used in lieu of the lamp required by paragraph (1) of subdivision (a).

(c) A red reflector, or reflectorized material meeting the requirements of Section 25500, attached to the operator and visible from a distance of 500 feet to the rear when directly in front of lawful upper beams of headlamps on a motor vehicle, may be used in lieu of the reflector required by paragraph (2) of subdivision (a).

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 722, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

21224.

(a) A person operating a motorized scooter is not subject to the provisions of this code relating to financial responsibility, registration, and license plate requirements, and, for those purposes, a motorized scooter is not a motor vehicle.

(b) A motorized scooter is exempt from the equipment requirements in Division 12 (commencing with Section 24000), except for Sections 24003 and 27400, Article 4 (commencing with Section 27450) of Chapter 5 of Division 12, and Section 27602.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (b), any motorized scooter may be equipped with equipment authorized by Division 12 (commencing with Section 24000).

(d) Any motorized scooter equipped with lighting equipment that is authorized by Division 12 (commencing with Section 24000) shall meet the lighting requirements in Article 1 (commencing with Section 24250) of Chapter 2 of Division 12 for that equipment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 722, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

21225.

This article does not prevent a local authority, by ordinance, from regulating the registration of motorized scooters and the parking and operation of motorized scooters on pedestrian or bicycle facilities and local streets and highways, if that regulation is not in conflict with this code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 755, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

21226.

(a) A person shall not sell or offer for sale a motorized scooter that produces a maximum noise level exceeding 80 dbA at a distance of 50 feet from the centerline of travel when tested in accordance with Society of Automotive Engineers (SAE) Recommended Practice J331 JAN00.

(b) A motorized scooter, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 407.5, shall at all times be equipped with a muffler meeting the requirements of this section, in constant operation and properly maintained to prevent any excessive or unusual noise, and a muffler or exhaust system shall not be equipped with a cutout, bypass, or similar device.

(c) A motorized scooter, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 407.5, operated off the highways shall at all times be equipped with a muffler meeting the requirements of this section, in constant operation and properly maintained to prevent any excessive or unusual noise, and a muffler or exhaust system shall not be equipped with a cutout, bypass, or similar device.

(d) A person shall not modify the exhaust system of a motorized scooter in a manner that will amplify or increase the noise level emitted by the motor of the scooter so that it is not in compliance with this section or exceeds the noise level limit established by subdivision (a). A person shall not operate a motorized scooter with an exhaust system so modified.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 755, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

21227.

(a) A motorized scooter shall comply with one of the following:

(1) Operate in a manner so that the electric motor is disengaged or ceases to function when the brakes are applied.

(2) Operate in a manner so that the motor is engaged through a switch or mechanism that, when released, will cause the electric motor to disengage or cease to function.

(b) It is unlawful for a person to operate a motorized scooter that does not meet one of the requirements of subdivision (a).

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 722, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

21228.

Any person operating a motorized scooter upon a highway at a speed less than the normal speed of traffic moving in the same direction at that time shall ride as close as practicable to the right-hand curb or right edge of the roadway, except under the following situations:

(a) When overtaking and passing another vehicle proceeding in the same direction.

(b) When preparing for a left turn, the operator shall stop and dismount as close as practicable to the right-hand curb or right edge of the roadway and complete the turn by crossing the roadway on foot, subject to the restrictions placed on pedestrians in Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 21950).

(c) (1) When reasonably necessary to avoid conditions, including, but not limited to, fixed or moving objects, vehicles, bicycles, pedestrians, animals, surface hazards, or substandard width lanes, which make it unsafe to continue along the right-hand curb or right edge of the roadway, subject to Section 21656.

(2) For the purposes of paragraph (1), a “substandard width lane” is a lane that is too narrow for a motorized scooter and another vehicle to travel safely side by side within the lane.

(d) Any person operating a motorized scooter upon a highway that carries traffic in one direction only and has two or more marked traffic lanes may operate the motorized scooter as near the left-hand curb or left edge of that roadway as practicable.

However, when preparing for a right turn, the operator shall stop and dismount as close as practicable to the left-hand curb or left edge of the highway and complete the turn by crossing the roadway on foot, subject to the restrictions placed on pedestrians in Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 21950).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 62, Sec. 306.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

21229.

(a) Whenever a class II bicycle lane has been established on a roadway, any person operating a motorized scooter upon the roadway shall ride within the bicycle lane, except that the person may move out of the lane under any of the following situations:

(1) When overtaking and passing another vehicle or pedestrian within the lane or when about to enter the lane if the overtaking and passing cannot be done safely within the lane.

(2) When preparing for a left turn, the operator shall stop and dismount as close as practicable to the right-hand curb or right edge of the roadway and complete the turn by crossing the roadway on foot, subject to the restrictions placed on pedestrians in Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 21950).

(3) When reasonably necessary to leave the bicycle lane to avoid debris or other hazardous conditions.

(4) When approaching a place where a right turn is authorized.

(b) No person operating a motorized scooter shall leave a bicycle lane until the movement can be made with reasonable safety and then only after giving an appropriate signal in the manner provided in Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 22100) in the event that any vehicle may be affected by the movement.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 722, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

21230.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a motorized scooter may be operated on a bicycle path or trail or bikeway, unless the local authority or the governing body of a local agency having jurisdiction over that path, trail, or bikeway prohibits that operation by ordinance.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 722, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

21235.

The operator of a motorized scooter shall not do any of the following:

(a) Operate a motorized scooter unless it is equipped with a brake that will enable the operator to make a braked wheel skid on dry, level, clean pavement.

(b) Operate a motorized scooter on a highway with a speed limit in excess of 25 miles per hour unless the motorized scooter is operated within a Class II or Class IV bikeway, except that a local authority may, by ordinance or resolution, authorize the operation of a motorized scooter outside of a Class II or Class IV bikeway on a highway with a speed limit of up to 35 miles per hour. The 15 mile per hour maximum speed limit for the operation of a motorized
 scooter specified in Section 22411 applies to the operation of a motorized scooter on all highways, including bikeways, regardless of a higher speed limit applicable to the highway.

(c) Operate a motorized scooter without wearing a properly fitted and fastened bicycle helmet that meets the standards described in Section 21212, if the operator is under 18 years of age.

(d) Operate a motorized scooter without a valid driver’s license or instruction permit.

(e) Operate a motorized scooter with any passengers in addition to the operator.

(f) Operate a motorized scooter carrying any package, bundle, or article that prevents the operator from keeping at least one hand upon the handlebars.

(g) Operate a motorized scooter upon a sidewalk, except as may be necessary to enter or leave adjacent property.

(h) Operate a motorized scooter on the highway with the handlebars raised so that the operator must elevate his or her hands above the level of his or her shoulders in order to grasp the normal steering grip area.

(i) Leave a motorized scooter lying on its side on any sidewalk, or park a motorized scooter on a sidewalk in any other position, so that there is not an adequate path for pedestrian traffic.

(j) Attach the motorized scooter or himself or herself while on the roadway, by any means, to any other vehicle on the roadway.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 552, Sec. 1.   (AB 2989)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5.5. Operation of Low-Speed Vehicles [21250. - 21266.]

21250.

For the purposes of this article, a low-speed vehicle means a vehicle as defined in Section 385.5. A “low-speed vehicle” is also known as a “neighborhood electric vehicle.”

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 422, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

21251.

Except as provided in Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 1965) of Division 2.5 of the Streets and Highways Code, and Sections 4023, 21115, and 21115.1, a low-speed vehicle is subject to all the provisions applicable to a motor vehicle, and the driver of a low-speed vehicle is subject to all the provisions applicable to the driver of a motor vehicle or other vehicle, when applicable, by this code or another code, with the exception of those provisions that, by their very nature, can have no application.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 564, Sec. 5.   (SB 1151)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

21252.

A vehicle dealer, selling a low-speed vehicle, shall provide to the buyer a disclosure statement regarding the operation of the vehicle that is in compliance with existing provisions of the California Code of Regulations.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 140, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

21253.

A low-speed vehicle operated or parked on the roadway shall at all times meet federal Motor Vehicle Safety Standards established for low-speed vehicles in Section 571.500 of Title 49 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 140, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

21254.

A motor vehicle that was originally designated as a low-speed vehicle and that has been modified or altered to exceed 25 miles per hour shall not qualify for the relaxed federal Motor Vehicle Safety Standards established for low-speed vehicles and instead shall meet all federal Motor Vehicle Safety Standards for a passenger vehicle.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 140, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

21260.

(a) Except as provided in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b), or in an area where a neighborhood electric vehicle transportation plan has been adopted pursuant to Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 1965) of Division 2.5 of the Streets and Highways Code, the operator of a low-speed vehicle shall not operate the vehicle on any roadway with a speed limit in excess of 35 miles per hour.

(b) (1) The operator of a low-speed vehicle may cross a roadway with a speed limit in excess of 35 miles per hour if the crossing begins and ends on a roadway with a speed limit of 35 miles per hour or less and occurs at an intersection of approximately 90 degrees.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), the
 operator of a low-speed vehicle shall not traverse an uncontrolled intersection with any state highway unless that intersection has been approved and authorized by the agency having primary traffic enforcement responsibilities for that crossing by a low-speed vehicle.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 564, Sec. 6.   (SB 1151)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

21266.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 21260, local authorities, by ordinance or resolution, may restrict or prohibit the use of low-speed vehicles.

(b) Notwithstanding Section 21260, a local law enforcement agency with primary traffic enforcement responsibilities or the Department of the California Highway Patrol may prohibit the operation of a low-speed vehicle on any roadway under that agency’s or department’s jurisdiction when the agency or the department deems the prohibition to be in the best interest of public safety. Any such prohibition shall become effective when appropriate signs giving notice thereof are erected upon the roadway.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 140, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Electric Personal Assistive Mobility Devices [21280. - 21282.]

21280.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(1) This state has severe traffic congestion and air pollution problems, particularly in its cities, and finding ways to reduce these problems is of paramount importance.
